District of Columbia statutes.
44-2102

Repealed

Expenses of indigent patients — Payment by Treasury Department

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1879, 20 Stat. 395, ch. 182, § 1
July 1, 1916, 39 Stat. 309, ch. 209, § 1
Nov. 8, 1984, 98 Stat. 3369, Pub. L. 98-621, § 10(v)
1981 Ed., § 32-602.
1973 Ed., § 32-402.
Section 11(b) of Pub. L. 98-621 makes § 10 of that act effective on October 1, 1987.